Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Penalties

196.990.
Penalties.

Any officer who violates subsection (1) of KRS 196.230 shall be fined not less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Action shall be brought in the county in which the institution is located.

Any officer or employee who violates subsection (3) of KRS 196.230 shall ipso facto forfeit his office or position, and the office or position shall be declared vacant.

History.
216a-3, 216aa-7, 216aa-21, 216aa-32, 423: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 146, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 418, § 15, effective July 15, 1994.